Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3713
Commission; statewide strategic plan; duties.

The commission shall develop a statewide strategic plan to cultivate and promote tourism in Nebraska. The commission shall review the plan annually and update as necessary. The plan shall include:

(1) A review of revenue in the State Visitors Promotion Cash Fund available for tourism development at the state level;

(2) An examination of best management practices for the tourism industry;

(3) Marketing strategies for promoting tourism;

(4) Methods to expand existing tourism capacity which may include encouraging regional cooperation, collaboration, or privatization; and

(5) Recommended strategies to provide technical assistance, marketing services, and state aid to local governments and the tourism industry in Nebraska.

Laws 1986, LB 965, § 13;

Laws 2011, LB684, § 1;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 81-1201.13;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 193;

Laws 2012, LB1053, § 13;

Laws 2017, LB222, § 8.